src/morphology/stemparts/digits.lexc
LEXICON DIGITS_YKSI




0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:een   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ee    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ii    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_KAKSI




0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ta    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:een   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ee    DIGITS_BACK_POSS ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ii    DIGITS_BACK_POSS ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_KOLME




0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:a DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:een   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ee    DIGITS_BACK_POSS ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ii    DIGITS_BACK_POSS ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_NELJÄ




0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ää    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ään   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ää    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ii    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_VIISI




0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:een   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ee    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ii    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_KUUSI




0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ta    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:een   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ee    DIGITS_BACK_POSS ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ii    DIGITS_BACK_POSS ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_SEITSEMÄN




0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ää    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ään   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ää    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ii    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
